District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

10-1202.17

Transition provisions; establishment of Interim Board of Directors.

Repealed.

Sept. 28, 1994, D.C. Law 10-188, § 213, 41 DCR 5333
Aug. 12, 1998, D.C. Law 12-142, § 2(j), 45 DCR 4826

History

1981 Ed., § 9-818.

Prior Codifications

For effective date of D.C. Law 12-142, see Historical and Statutory Notes following § 10-1202.01.

Effective Dates

Pub. L. 105-227, § 2, Aug. 12, 1998, 112 Stat. 1515, provided: “Notwithstanding section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, the Washington Convention Center Authority Financing Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-402) shall take effect on the date of the enactment of this Act.”

Editor's Notes